California, session 20252026, AB1874.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13351 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:13351. (a) The department immediately shall revoke the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of any of the following crimes or offenses:(1) Manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, except when convicted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code.(2) Conviction of three or more violations of Section 20001, 20002, 23103, 23104, or 23105 within a period of 12 months from the time of the first offense to the third or subsequent offense, or a combination of three or more convictions of violations within the same period.(3) Violation of subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code or of Section 2800.3 causing serious bodily injury resulting in a serious impairment of physical condition, including, but not limited to, loss of consciousness, concussion, serious bone fracture, protracted loss or impairment of function of any bodily member or organ, and serious disfigurement.(b) The department shall not reinstate the privilege revoked under subdivision (a) until the expiration of three years after the date of revocation and until the person whose privilege was revoked gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.(c) For individuals convicted of crimes described in subdivision (a) who are imprisoned in a county jail or state prison as a result of the conviction or convictions, the department shall not reinstate the privilege revoked under subdivision (a) until the expiration of three years after the person’s release from confinement or imprisonment, and until the person whose privilege was revoked gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.SECTION 1.Section 13107 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:13107.(a)Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a court imposes a suspension, as defined in Section 13102, or a revocation, as defined in Section 13101, of a person’s driver’s license as part of a criminal sentence, the period of suspension or revocation shall commence upon the person’s release from custody, as defined in Section 4901 of the Penal Code.(b)A court shall not order any period of driver’s license suspension or revocation to run concurrently with any period of incarceration in a county jail, a state prison, or any other custodial facility.(c)Nothing in this section alters, limits, or delays any administrative action taken by the Department of Motor Vehicles, including actions taken pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Division 6 (commencing with Section 13350).___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 1 and 2.___________________